Utah statutes.
20A-16-202.   Report on absentee ballots.

(1)  Not later than 60 days after each regular general election, each county clerk shall submit a report to the lieutenant governor indicating:

(a)  the number of ballots sent to covered voters; and

(b)  the number of ballots returned by covered voters that were counted.

(2)  Not later than 90 days after each regular general election, the lieutenant governor shall submit a statewide report to the Election Assistance Commission that includes the information required by Subsection (1).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 327, 2011 General Session

